Missouri, session 2026, SB1077.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 1, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 1.810, to read as
follows:
1.810. 1. This section shall be known and may be
cited as the "Missouri Religious Liberty Act".
2. (1) The general assembly hereby:
(a) Finds and declares that religious liberty is among
the most sacred rights recognized by the founders of this
nation, and that freedom of conscience and worship are
fundamental to the preservation of civil society;
(b) Finds and declares that the government of the
United States was established with the understanding that no
power of civil authority should ever be exercised to limit
or prohibit the free exercise of religion, or to close or
restrict houses of worship;
(c) Affirms the words of President George Washington:
"If I could now conceive that the general government might
ever be so administered as to render the liberty of
conscience insecure, I beg you will be persuaded that no one
would be more zealous than myself to establish effectual
barriers against the horrors of spiritual tyranny, and every

SB 1077 2
species of religious persecution". Letter from George
Washington, President of the United States, to the United
Baptist Churches of Virginia (May 1789) (Founders Online,
National Archives);
(d) Affirms the words of President George Washington:
"Of all the dispositions and habits which lead to political
prosperity, religion and morality are indispensable
supports". George Washington, President of the United
States, Washington's Farewell Address to the People of the
United States (September 19, 1796); and
(e) Affirms the words of President John Adams: "Our
Constitution was made only for a moral and religious
people. It is wholly inadequate to the government of any
other". Letter from John Adams, President of the United
States, to the Officers of the First Brigade of the Third
Division of the Militia of Massachusetts (October 11, 1798)
(The Adams Papers, Massachusetts Historical Society).
(2) In light of these principles, it is the intent of
the general assembly that the free exercise of religion,
including the right of houses of worship to assemble, shall
not be abridged, suspended, or prohibited by the state or a
local authority.
3. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Place of worship", a building or grounds where
activities of religious groups are conducted;
(2) "Public official", any elected or appointed
officer, employee, or agent of the state of Missouri or any
political subdivision, board, commission, bureau, or other
public body thereof.
4. No public official shall issue an order that has
the effect of limiting or prohibiting religious groups from
holding religious services or meetings.

SB 1077 3
5. No public official shall issue an order that has
the effect of limiting or prohibiting places of worship from
holding religious services or meetings.
6. The provisions of subsections 4 and 5 of this
section shall not apply to religious groups using places of
worship to knowingly commit or plan to commit acts of
violence or harm.
7. The provisions of subsections 4 and 5 of this
section shall not be interpreted to exclude places of
worship from complying with applicable building and fire
codes.
✓